Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1113
Liability.

The member and alternate payee shall hold the statewide public retirement system and its fiduciaries harmless from any liabilities which arise from (1) treating a domestic relations order as being, or not being, a qualified domestic relations order, or (2) taking action pursuant to section 42-1111. The system's obligation to the member and each alternate payee shall be discharged to the extent of any payment made pursuant to the Spousal Pension Rights Act.

Laws 1996, LB 1273, § 13.